src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Even syllabic verbs I, cg n:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, jiõnn:jiõn
 n:0 <=>
      n: (ˈ:)  _  (j|%{ʼØ%}: i:)  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C: |(%^Allegro:) ((%^PALE: |%^PALẸ: ) %^PAL: ) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^CCC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX: ] ;
!!päʹrnn
!! vueʹn+N+Sg+Nom: **mother-in-law/anoppi**
!€ vuâ{ʹØ}nˈn^PALE^PAL^CCC2C
!!€ vuâ{ʹØ}nˈn^PALE^PAL^CCC2C
!!€ vueʹn00000
!! čuânj+N+Sg+Nom: **goose/hanhi**
!€ čuõnˈnj ^VOWLower:0 ^CCC2C
!!€ čuõnˈnj^VOWLower^CCC2C
!!€ čuân00j00
!! jeäʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: **mother/äiti**
!€ jeä0{ʹØ}nˈn^PALẸ^PAL^CCC2CAllegro>stan
!!€ jeä0{ʹØ}nˈn^PALẸ^PAL^CCC2CAllegro>stan
!!€ jiẹˈʹn00000>stan
!! õõʹnni+N+Pl+Nom: **user/käyttäjä**
!€ õõʹnn{ʹØ}i^CC2C
!!€ õõʹnn{ʹØ}i^CC2C
!!€ õõʹn00i0
         Vow: (%^1VOW:)  (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) n: _ (j) NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX:] ;
      n: (ˈ: ) _ (j) Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CCC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
!! huânas+N+Sg+Nom: ****
!€ huânˈnas ^Pen:0 ^CCC2C
!!€ huânˈnas^Pen^CCC2C
!!€ huân00as00

"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel ij>ii/uv>uu and dd>d"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen, sijdd > siid

 d:0 <=> d _ NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX:] ;
!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^YXX2YX
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^YXX2YX
!!€ ääld000
!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>už
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>už
!!€ aald0000>už
 [v: | j:] (%{ʹØ%}:) d _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^YXX2VX:] ;
!€ u^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}dd^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ u^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}dd^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ u00uʹd000
!! juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
!€ ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV ^VOWLower:0 ^YXX2YX>am
!!€ ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX>am
!!€ joord0000>am

!! uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+4:
!€ u^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}dd^PAL^YXX2VX>et
!!€ u^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}dd^PAL^YXX2VX>et
!!€ u00uʹd000>et


! njeiddad > njeeid
! 2012-06-12 v:u allows for uʹvdded
!! - idd:id, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg double consonants following vowel and "i" at coda that become single consonants in gradation
         d _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m]  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
!! uudâs+N+Sg+Nom: **creature/luomus**
!€ uvddâs ^Pen:0 ^YXX2VX
!!€ uvddâs^Pen^YXX2VX
!!€ uud0âs00





"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for ʒ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  pääʹʒʒelm+N+Sg+Ill: päʹʒlma
 ʒ:0 <=>
      u: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) v:u (%{ʹØ%}:) ʒ _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^YXX2VX: ;
      [Vow - u] (%^1VOW:) (0:) (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:) ʒ _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [%^YXX2YX: |[(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:]] ;
!! sauʒʒ+N+Pl+Nom **sheep/lammas**
!€ sa^1VOWuʒʒ^V2VV^YXX2YX
!!€ sa^1VOWuʒʒ^V2VV^YXX2YX
!!€ saauʒ000

        Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) ʒ _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m]  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;
      [v: | j:] (%{ʹØ%}:) ʒ _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^YXX2VX:] ;


"ǯ:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 ǯ:0 <=>
      Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [ v: (%{ʹØ%}:)|Cns:] ǯ _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |(%^PAL:) %^YXX2YX: |(%^PAL:)  %^YXX2VX: ] ;
      Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ǯ _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |(%^PAL:) %^YXX2YX: ] ;
!! kuʹvǯǯ+N+Sg+Gen
!€ ku^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}ǯǯ^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ ku^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}ǯǯ^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ ku00uʹǯ000
        Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) ǯ _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: | (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |(%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;


"č:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 č:0 <=>
        Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: č _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;

       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns: |(ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) [h: |j:] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) | [u|i] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) ] č: _ [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen:] [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX:] ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) č:  _ NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [%^YXX2VX: | %^KK2GAllegro: ] ;
    Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) č _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: (%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: ;

    Vow: (%^1VOW:) ( [u|i] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) ) č: _ [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen:] (%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: ;


"c:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 c:0 <=>
        (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: c _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
!!
!€ kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cces ^Pen:0 ^V2VV ^Pen:0 ^PAL ^Pen:0 ^YXX2VX
!!€ kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cces^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^YXX2VX
!!€ kää0uʹc0es000000
       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns: | (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) [h: |j:] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) | [u|i] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) ] c: _ [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL|Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen:] [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX:] ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) c:  _ [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^KK2GAllegro: |Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:] ] ;

"ž:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 ž:0 <=>
      Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) ž _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: ž _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;

      Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) ž _ Vow: Cns:+  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;
!! väžsted+V+Inf
!€ vääžžast ^Pen:0  ^VV2V:0  ^Pen:0 ^CC2CAllegro ^RmVow:0 ^PALK > e d
!!€ vääžžast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow^PALK>ed
!!€ vä0ž00st000000>ed

"z:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 z:0 <=>
      Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) z _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX:] ;
        (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: z _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;
      Vow: _ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^PenVow2a:) %^RmCns: ;
!€ ǩeâsttez ^Pen:0 Vow2a^RmCns
!!€ ǩeâsttez^PenVow2a^RmCns
!!€ ǩeâstta000
        (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) z _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;
!! juzrdâd+V+Inf:
!€ juuzzârd ^Pen:0  ^VV2V:0  ^Pen:0 ^CC2C ^RmVow:0 
!!€ juuzzârd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow
!!€ ju0z00rd00000

"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for đ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
 đ:0 <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) đ: _    NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:] ;
!!€ ǩi^1VOWđđ^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ǩiiđ000
          đ: (ˈ:) _ Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: | %^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:] ;
!€ o^1VOWđđâs ^Pen:0 ^V2VV ^Pen:0 ^CC2C
!!€ o^1VOWđđâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C
!!€ oođ0âs0000

"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for r"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  võrr:võõr
 r:0 <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW:) (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:)  r: (ˈ:) _    NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^CCC2C: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX:] ;
!€ võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ võõr000
!€ paarr^CC2C
!!€ paarr^CC2C
!!€ paar00
!€ jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ jääuʹr0000
 Vow: (%^1VOW:) (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) r: (ˈ:) _  Vow: Cns:+  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
!! čårsted+V+Inf: **descriminate/syrjiä**
!€ čåårrast ^Pen:0  ^VV2V:0  ^Pen:0 ^CC2C ^RmVow:0  > e d
!!€ čåårrast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!€ čå0r00st00000>ed
!$ čåårrast ^Pen:0  ^VV2V:0  ^Pen:0 ^CC2C ^RmVow:0  > e d
!!$ čåårrast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!$ čå0rr0st00000>ed
      [v: | j:] (%{ʹØ%}:) r _  NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^YXX2VX:] ;


"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for l"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used with  vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen: vuuʹl
 l:0 <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j|%{ʼØ%}: i:)   NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^CCC2C: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX:] ;
! Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j)   NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^CCC2C: |%^YXX2YX: |%^YXX2VX:] ;
!! deriving
!€ to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ tool000
!€ stä^1VOW{ʹØ}llj^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ stä^1VOW{ʹØ}llj^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ stääʹl0j000
!! alttõõlli+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen
!€ alttõõll{ʼØ}i^CC2C
!!€ alttõõll{ʼØ}i^CC2C
!!€ alttõõl00i0

 Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j) (%{ʼØ%}:) Vow: [Cns:*|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m]  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
! Vow: (%^1VOW: |%{ˈ1%}: |0:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j)   PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C: |(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:] ;
!! pääʹljes+N+Sg+Nom: **path/polku**
!€ pä^1VOW{ʹØ}lljes ^Pen:0 ^V2VV ^Pen:0 ^PAL ^Pen:0 ^CC2C
!!€ pä^1VOW{ʹØ}lljes^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^CC2C
!!€ pääʹl0jes000000
!! talsted+V+Inf:
!€ taallâst ^Pen:0  ^VV2V:0  ^Pen:0 ^CC2C ^RmVow:0  > e d
!!€ taallâst^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!€ ta0l00st00000>ed
